Rhode Island statutes. Title 18 Fiduciaries
Chapter 12 Uniform Management of Institutional Funds [Repealed.]

18-12-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 114, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 154, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 63, § 1, effective June 30, 2009. For comparable provisions, see chapter 12.1 of this title.

18-12-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 154, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 63, § 1, effective June 30, 2009. For comparable provisions, see chapter 12.1 of this title.

18-12-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 63, § 1, effective June 30, 2009. For comparable provisions, see chapter 12.1 of this title.

18-12-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 63, § 1, effective June 30, 2009. For comparable provisions, see chapter 12.1 of this title.

18-12-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 63, § 1, effective June 30, 2009. For comparable provisions, see chapter 12.1 of this title.

18-12-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 63, § 1, effective June 30, 2009. For comparable provisions, see chapter 12.1 of this title.

18-12-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 63, § 1, effective June 30, 2009. For comparable provisions, see chapter 12.1 of this title.

18-12-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 63, § 1, effective June 30, 2009. For comparable provisions, see chapter 12.1 of this title.

18-12-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 260, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 63, § 1, effective June 30, 2009. For comparable provisions, see chapter 12.1 of this title.